apertium-ky-en.ky.lexc
LEXICON PRON-DEM-AL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:л # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:нын # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ны # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:га # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:нда # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ндан # ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-TIGIL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:л # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:нин # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ни # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ге # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:нде # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:нден # ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SEN

%<nom%>:ен # ;
%<gen%>:енин # ;
%<acc%>:ени # ;
%<dat%>:ага # ;
%<loc%>:енде # ;
%<abl%>:енден # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SIZ

%<nom%>:из # ;
%<gen%>:изди # ;
%<acc%>:издин # ;
%<dat%>:изге # ;
%<loc%>:изде # ;
%<abl%>:изден # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-AL

%<nom%>:л # ;
%<gen%>:ны # ;
%<acc%>:нын # ;
%<dat%>:га # ;
%<loc%>:нда # ;
%<abl%>:ндан # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SILER

%<nom%>: # ;
%<gen%>:%>д%{I%} # ;
%<acc%>:%>д%{I%}н # ;
%<dat%>:%>г%{A%} # ;
%<loc%>:%>д%{A%} # ;
%<abl%>:%>д%{A%}н # ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG

%<prn%>%<itg%>: CASES  ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL

%<prn%>%<ref%>: CASES  ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: CASES ;



LEXICON V-CLIT 

%+би%<qst%>:%>%{B%}%{I%} # ;
# ;

LEXICON V-PERS-POSS ! P_2

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%} V-CLIT ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%} V-CLIT ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-COP ! P_3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>: V-CLIT ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p3%>%<pl%>: V-CLIT ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-PAST ! P_4

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з V-CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: V-CLIT ;  
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}%{K%} V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: V-CLIT ;  

LEXICON V-PERS-PRES ! P_6

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м V-CLIT ; 
!%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>т V-CLIT ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з V-CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;  
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>т V-CLIT ; 

!LEXICON V-PERS-IMPER ! P_6

LEXICON V-INFL-COMMON

! Converbs 
%<cv_impf%>:%>%{E%} # ;                                       !
!%<cv_perf%>:%>%{I%}п # ;                                      ! -ып, -ип, -уп, -үп
%<cv_perf%>:%>п # ;                                      ! -ып, -ип, -уп, -үп
%<cv_inf%>:%>м%{A%}к # ;                                      !
%<cv_irre%>:%>%{E%}т # ;                                      !
%<cv_fut%>:%>%{A%}р # ;                                       !
%<cv_fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р # ;                                  ! Dir/LR
%<cv_pur%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%{I%} # ;                             ! 

! Non-finite forms and participles
%<pp%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н POSSESSION ;                             ! -
%<inf2%>:%>%{I%}ш POSSESSION ;                                ! -ыш, -иш, -уш, -үш
%<neg%>%<pp%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{G%}%{A%}н POSSESSION ;          !
%<neg%>%<pp2%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{G%}%{A%}н%{I%} POSSESSION ;    ! 
%<neg%>%<inf2%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{I%}ш POSSESSION ;             !
%<plist%>:%>м%{A%}й # ;                                       !

! Finite forms
%<pres%>:%>%{A%} V-PERS-PRES ;                                ! TODO: Check
%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRES ;                                 !
%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-COP ;                                 !
%<fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р V-PERS-COP ;                            ! Dir/LR
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;                            ! 
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-COP ;                           ! 
%<cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-PAST ;                               ! 
%<opt%>:%>м%{A%}к%>ч%{I%} V-PERS-COP ;                        !   
%<pih%>:%>ч%{U%} V-PERS-COP ;                                 ! 
%<pot%>:%>ч%{U%}%>д%{A%}й V-PERS-COP ;                        ! 
%<pcond%>:%>м%{A%}к V-PERS-COP ;                              ! 

%<neg%>%<pres%>:%>%{B%}%{A%} V-PERS-PRES ;                    ! TODO: Check
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}р V-PERS-COP ;              !
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}%{A%}р V-PERS-COP ;         ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<ifi%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;         ! 
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRES ;              !
%<neg%>%<cond%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>с%{A%} V-PERS-PAST ;            ! 
%<neg%>%<past%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-COP ;        ! 
%<neg%>%<pcond%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>м%{A%}к V-PERS-COP ;           ! 
%<neg%>%<pih%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>ч%{U%} V-PERS-COP ;              ! 

LEXICON V-INFL

%<v%>%<TD%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<TD%>%<inf%>:%>%{U%}%{U%} POSSESSION ;                    ! 
%<v%>%<TD%>%<neg%>%<inf%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{U%}%{U%} POSSESSION ; !

LEXICON V-INFL-TV-SHORT

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-INFL-IV-SHORT

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-INFL-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<inf%>:%>%{U%}%{U%} POSSESSION ;                                      ! 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<inf%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{U%}%{U%} POSSESSION ;                   !

LEXICON V-INFL-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<inf%>:%>%{U%}%{U%} POSSESSION ;                                      ! 
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<inf%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{U%}%{U%} POSSESSION ;                   !

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                  L E X I C O N    E N T R I E S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Particles 

да PART ; ! "also, too"
го PART ; ! "also, too"
мына PART ; ! "here is, вот"
эгер PART ; ! conjunction like particle "if"
эгерде PART ; ! conjunction like particle "if"
сыяктуу PART ; ! modal particle; adjective, usually with dative "similar to"
экен PART ; ! non-eyewitness modal particle
экен PART-PERS-COP ; ! non-eyewitness modal particle
эле PART ; ! 
эле PART-PERS-PAST ; ! 

LEXICON Postadverbs 

гана POSTADV ; ! "only"
эле POSTADV ; ! "only"
деле POSTADV ; ! "even"

LEXICON Conjunctions 

жана CC ; ! "and"
да CC ; ! "and"
же CC ; ! "or"
менен CC ; ! "and"
не CC ; ! "neither... nor..."
ал CA ; ! "but"
бирок CA ; ! "but"
анткени CS ; ! "because"
себеби CS ; ! "because"

LEXICON Postpositions

менен POST ; ! "with"
дейре POST ; ! "up to, until"
чейин POST ; ! "up to, until"
кийин POST ; ! "with"
сайын POST ; ! "every"
үчүн POST ; ! "for" +nom
жакка POST ; ! "toward"
чакты POST ; ! "about, around"
катары POST ; ! "as a" +nom
аркылуу POST ; ! "through" +nom
тууралуу POST ; ! "through" +nom
ичинде POST ; ! "inside of" +gen|+nom
жараша POST ; ! "by, in accordance with" +dat
боюнча POST ; ! "according to" +nom
жөнүнд POST ; ! "about" +nom
жөнүндө POST ; ! "about" +nom
тиешелүү POST ; ! "belonging to" +dat
карата POST ; ! "" +dat


LEXICON Determiners

бул DET-DEM ; ! "this"
ошол DET-DEM ; ! "that"
ушул DET-DEM ; ! "this (visible)"
ал DET-DEM ; ! "that"
тигил DET-DEM ; ! "that (yonder)"

айрым DET-IND ; ! "other"
ушундай DET-IND ; ! "this kind of"

кээ% бир DET-QNT ; ! "some"
бир% нече DET-QNT ; ! "some, several"
көптөгөн DET-QNT ; ! "many"

кайсы DET-ITG ; ! "which?"

LEXICON VerbStems
жок%<v%>%<neg%>%<exi%>:жок V-PERS-COP ;
эмес%<v%>%<neg%>:эмес V-PERS-PAST ;
бол V-INFL-IV ; ! "be"
чыгар V-INFL-TV ; ! "" 
аарчы V-INFL-IV ;  ! ""
аарчы V-INFL-TV ;  ! ""
айлант V-INFL-TV ; ! "give headache"
айт V-INFL-IV ; ! "tell"
айт V-INFL-TV ; ! "tell"
акса V-INFL-IV ; ! "limp"
ас V-INFL-TV ; ! "hang"
ат V-INFL-TV ; ! "shoot"
ач V-INFL-TV ; ! "open"
аш V-INFL-IV ; 
бар V-INFL-IV ; ! "go"
бил V-INFL-TV ; ! "know"
де V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "say"
жат V-INFL-IV ; ! "come"
же V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "eat"
жет V-INFL-IV ; 
ич V-INFL-IV ; ! "drink"
ич V-INFL-TV ; ! "drink"
иште V-INFL-IV ;  ! "work"
кел V-INFL-IV ; ! "come"
кет V-INFL-IV ; ! "go"
кой V-INFL-TV ; ! "put, place" 
күл V-INFL-IV ; ! "smile, laugh"
оку V-INFL-IV ; ! "read"
оку V-INFL-TV ; ! "read"
окшо V-INFL-IV ; ! "be similar to"
саба V-INFL-TV ;  ! ""
сүй V-INFL-TV ; ! "love"
таң% ат V-INFL-TV ; ! "dawn"
тур V-INFL-IV ; ! "stand, live"
түздө V-INFL-TV ; ! ""
ук V-INFL-IV ; ! "listen"
ук V-INFL-TV ; ! "listen"
укта V-INFL-IV ; ! "sleep"
чий V-INFL-TV ; ! "draw a line"
ач V-INFL-TV ; ! "open"
бар V-INFL-TV ; ! "go"
бил V-INFL-IV ; ! "know"
бар V-INFL ; 
аракет% кыл V-INFL ; 
арна V-INFL ; 
аякта V-INFL ; 
бак V-INFL ; 
башта V-INFL ; 
без V-INFL ; 
бер V-INFL-TV ; 
билдир V-INFL ; 
билин V-INFL ; 
боё V-INFL ; 
буз V-INFL ; 
бузул V-INFL ; 
буйрук% бер V-INFL ; 
була V-INFL ; 
бурул V-INFL ; 
бута V-INFL ; 
буу V-INFL ; 
буюр V-INFL ; 
бырыштыр V-INFL ; 
быч V-INFL ; 
быш V-INFL ; 
бүк V-INFL ; 
бүктө V-INFL ; 
бүт V-INFL-IV ; 
бөл V-INFL ; 
гий V-INFL ; 
гэр V-INFL ; 
дала V-INFL ; 
даярда V-INFL ; 
де V-INFL ; ! "say"
елестет V-INFL ; 
жаа V-INFL ; 
жаз V-INFL-TV ; 
жай V-INFL ; 
жан V-INFL ; 
жаркыра V-INFL ; 
жарыл V-INFL ; 
жаша V-INFL ; 
же V-INFL ; ! "eat"
жибер V-INFL ; 
жинден V-INFL ; 
жон V-INFL ; 
жулмала V-INFL ; 
жум V-INFL ; 
жыгыл V-INFL ; 
жый V-INFL ; 
жыйнал V-INFL ; 
жыйынтыкта V-INFL ; 
жык V-INFL ; 
жырт V-INFL ; 
жытта V-INFL ; 
жэ V-INFL ; 
жэң V-INFL ; 
жүктө V-INFL ; 
илгериле V-INFL ; 
кайнат V-INFL ; 
кал V-INFL ; 
кара V-INFL-IV ; 
кара V-INFL-TV ;
карма V-INFL ; 
кары V-INFL ; 
карышта V-INFL ; 
кат V-INFL-TV ; 
керек V-INFL ; 
кес V-INFL ; 
кеч V-INFL ; 
кир V-INFL ; 
кооздо V-INFL ; 
корго V-INFL ; 
кош V-INFL ; 
кошомат% кыл V-INFL ; 
коңурук% тарт V-INFL ; 
кубала V-INFL ; 
кула V-INFL ; 
кулат V-INFL ; 
кура V-INFL ; 
кургат V-INFL ; 
кучакта V-INFL ; 
кый% ет V-INFL ; 
кыйна V-INFL ; 
кыл V-INFL-TV ; 
кырк V-INFL ; 
кыс V-INFL ; 
күй V-INFL ; 
күнөөлө V-INFL ; 
көбөйт V-INFL ; 
көр V-INFL ; 
көрсөт V-INFL ; 
макта V-INFL ; 
мин V-INFL ; 
мин V-INFL ; 
муунт V-INFL ; 
муунт V-INFL ; 
мыйооло V-INFL ; 
оз V-INFL ; 
ойно V-INFL ; 
окшош V-INFL ; 
онто V-INFL ; 
ор V-INFL ; 
оро V-INFL ; 
отто V-INFL ; 
отур V-INFL ; ! "sit"
пайда% кыл V-INFL ; 
парала V-INFL ; 
планда V-INFL ; 
саба V-INFL ; 
сагын V-INFL ; 
сайра V-INFL ; 
салаңда V-INFL ; 
салкында V-INFL ; 
сана V-INFL-TV ; 
сез V-INFL ; 
секир V-INFL ; 
секир V-INFL ; 
сик V-INFL ; 
сиң V-INFL ; 
сугар V-INFL ; 
сун V-INFL ; 
сура V-INFL ; 
сыз V-INFL ; 
сыйла V-INFL-TV ; 
сыла V-INFL ; 
сүз V-INFL ; 
сүйлө V-INFL ; ! "speak"
сүр V-INFL ; 
тааныл V-INFL ; 
таарын V-INFL ; 
тажа V-INFL ; 
талкала V-INFL ; 
там V-INFL ; 
тан% кал V-INFL ; 
тап V-INFL ; 
тартуула V-INFL ; 
тартын V-INFL ; 
ташы V-INFL ; 
таң%кал V-INFL ; 
теп V-INFL ; 
терде V-INFL ; 
теш V-INFL ; 
тиз V-INFL ; 
тик V-INFL ; 
той V-INFL ; 
токто V-INFL ; ! "stop" 
тол V-INFL ; 
толукта V-INFL ; 
топто V-INFL ; 
топтол V-INFL ; 
тосуп% ал V-INFL ; 
тоң V-INFL ; 
тут V-INFL ; 
түгөн V-INFL ; 
түзүл V-INFL ; 
түтө V-INFL ; 
түш V-INFL ; 
түш V-INFL ; 
төк V-INFL ; 
төлө V-INFL ; 
узат V-INFL ; 
ушала V-INFL ; 
чак V-INFL ; 
чакыр V-INFL ; 
чал V-INFL ; 
чарчат V-INFL ; 
чач V-INFL ; 
чеч V-INFL ; 
чиймеле V-INFL ; 
чумку V-INFL ; 
чык V-INFL ; 
чөк V-INFL ; 
шайла V-INFL ; 
шиши V-INFL ; 
шүкүр% кыл V-INFL ; 
ыйла V-INFL ; 
эсте V-INFL ; 
эш V-INFL ; 
ээрчи% ет V-INFL ; 
үр V-INFL ; 
өл V-INFL-IV ; 
өлчө V-INFL ; 
өрттө V-INFL ; 
өчүр V-INFL ; 
ал V-INFL-TV ;
тарт V-INFL-IV ;
жайгаш V-INFL-IV ;
ата V-INFL-TV ;
котор V-INFL-TV ;
эсепте V-INFL-TV ;
жүр V-INFL-TV ;
тааны V-INFL-TV ;
бас V-INFL-IV ;
өт V-INFL-TV ;
колдон V-INFL-TV ;
сал V-INFL-TV ;
маектеш V-INFL ;
жаса V-INFL-IV ;
жарыяла V-INFL-TV ;
түз V-INFL-IV ;
белгиле V-INFL-TV ;
тий V-INFL-TV ;
сакта V-INFL-TV ;
тый V-INFL ;
кач V-INFL-IV ;
кач V-INFL-TV ;
көч V-INFL-IV ;
ыйгар V-INFL ;
